Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2533
Petitions; illegal acts; penalty.

Whoever falsely makes or willfully destroys a petition or any part thereof, or signs a false name thereto, or signs or files any petition knowing the same or any part thereof to be falsely made, or suppresses any petition, or any part thereof, which has been duly filed, pursuant to sections 18-2501 to 18-2531 shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor with a limit of five hundred dollars on the fine.

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 33.